Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2730.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Section 41-3026.09, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3030.22, to read: START_STATUTE41-3030.22. Board of occupational therapy examiners; termination July 1, 2030 A. The board of occupational therapy examiners terminates on July 1, 2030. B. Title 32, chapter 34 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2031.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the board of occupational therapy examiners to promote the safe and professional practice of occupational therapy. Sec. 4. Retroactivity Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply retroactively to from and after July 1, 2026.